Missouri, session 2026, HB1912.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 204, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 204.605, to read as follows:
204.605. Any reorganized common sewer district that is authorized to engage in
the construction, maintenance, and operation of water supply and distribution facilities
is hereby authorized to acquire, construct, improve or extend, maintain, and operate a
combined waterworks and sewerage system. Any such combined waterworks and
sewerage system may consist of an existing sewerage system, an existing waterworks, a
sewerage system to be acquired or to be constructed, or a waterworks to be acquired or
constructed, or any combination thereof, and may include any improvements or
extensions to be acquired or constructed either to an existing sewerage system or to an
existing waterworks or to both. Any such reorganized common sewer district desiring
to operate and maintain a combined waterworks and sewerage system shall adopt a
resolution declaring that its waterworks, whether then existing or to be acquired or
constructed, and its sewerage system then existing or to be acquired or constructed shall
thenceforth be operated and maintained as a combined waterworks and sewerage
system and may provide that such combined system shall include all future
improvements or extensions, whether to the waterworks or to the sewerage system, or
to both. All applicable provisions of this chapter shall apply to the construction,
operation, and maintenance of combined waterworks and sewerage system facilities,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1912 2
including the issuance of bonds payable from the revenues of the combined waterworks
and sewerage system, in the same manner as they apply to like functions relating to
sewer treatment facilities.
✔